Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202628-322.03
Sexual abuse of an inmate, parolee, probationer, or problem solving court participant in the second degree; penalty.

Any person who subjects an inmate, a parolee, a probationer, or a problem solving court participant to sexual contact in violation of section 28-322.01 is guilty of sexual abuse of an inmate, a parolee, a probationer, or a problem solving court participant in the second degree. Sexual abuse of an inmate, a parolee, a probationer, or a problem solving court participant in the second degree is a Class IIIA felony.

Laws 1999, LB 511, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 20;

Laws 2026, LB965, § 11.
July 18, 2026
Registration of sex offenders, see sections 29-4001 to 29-4014.